Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB954.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1513 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1513. Operating program.* * *(f.1) Additional minimum system performance criteria.--(1) The department shall establish additional minimum system performance criteria for the Southeastern Pennsylvania Transportation Authority to improve fare evasion, public-private transportation partnerships and bus routes. The department shall promulgate regulations, including temporary regulations, to establish the minimum system performance criteria based upon comparison of the award recipient to the authority's past performance and to the authority's peers that an award recipient must satisfy.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Failure of the authority to satisfy the minimum system performance criteria established under paragraph (1) shall result in application of the procedure in subsection (g).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0954PN1075 - 2 - 123456